Arkansas, session 2025, HB1461.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 25-1-106 is amended to read as follows:
25-1-106. Evaluation of necessity of various commissions and boards —
Definitions.
(a) For purposes of this section:
(1) “Constitutional board or commission” means the Arkansas
State Game and Fish Commission, the State Highway Commission, and all boards
or commissions charged with the management or control of all charitable,
penal or correctional institutions, or institutions of higher learning under
Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 33; and
(2) “State board or commission” means every state board,
commission, committee, council, advisory council, task force, and similar
entity created by the General Assembly except:
(A) A constitutional board or commission; and
(B) An entity of the General Assembly.
(b) A state board or commission that has not convened a meeting or has
convened without a quorum for two (2) consecutive regularly scheduled meeting
*LGL037*
03-05-2025 10:22:12 LGL037

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 HB1461
dates within the preceding two-year period shall vote to elect a new chair
and vice chair.
(c)(1) A state board or commission that has no powers or duties
prescribed by law and that has not convened a meeting or not convened a
meeting with a quorum within the preceding two-year period shall be
abolished.
(2) Upon abolition of a state board or commission or an advisory
council under subdivision (c)(1) of this section, the controlling agency or
department of the board, commission, or advisory council shall report the
abolition to the Legislative Council before the next meeting of the
Legislative Council.
(c)(1) If a state board or commission has not convened a regularly
scheduled meeting or has convened without a quorum for four (4) consecutive
regularly scheduled meeting dates within the preceding two-year period, the
Joint Performance Review Committee shall reevaluate the purpose, need, and
effectiveness of the state board or commission.
(2) The Joint Performance Review Committee shall report its
findings and any recommendations concerning the existence of the state board
or commission to the Legislative Council no later than December 1 of each
even-numbered year and shall draft legislation to implement the
recommendations.
(d)(1) No later than August 1 of each even-numbered year, each state
board and commission shall provide the Joint Performance Review Committee
with a report of the regularly scheduled meeting dates for the state board or
commission for the previous two (2) fiscal years, including the attendance
record of each member and the number of meetings that were convened.
(2)(A) If a state board or commission, other than a
constitutional board or commission, has not submitted the report required in
subdivision (d)(1) of this section to the Joint Performance Review Committee
by August 1 of each even-numbered year, the authority of the state board or
commission may shall be suspended on August 1 of the even-numbered year by
the Joint Performance Review Committee at the next Joint Performance Review
Committee meeting, and the state board or commission may shall not take any
action, including the expenditure of funds, until the report required in
subdivision (d)(1) of this section is provided to the Joint Performance
Review Committee.
03-05-2025 10:22:12 LGL037

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 HB1461
(B) The authority of a state board or commission that is
suspended under subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this section shall be restored when
the report required under subdivision (d)(1) is provided to the Joint
Performance Review Committee.
(3)(A) If a state board or commission, other than a
constitutional board or commission, has not submitted the report required in
subdivision (d)(1) of this section to the Joint Performance Review Committee
by December 1 of the even-numbered year, has not convened a regularly
scheduled meeting or has convened without a quorum for four (4) consecutive
regularly scheduled meeting dates within the preceding two-year period, the
Joint Performance Review Committee may shall direct the Bureau of Legislative
Research to draft legislation that:
(A)(i) Abolishes the state board or commission upon sine
die adjournment of the next regular session of the General Assembly;
(B)(ii) Allows the reversion of all authority of the state
board or commission to the General Assembly or to the General Assembly's
designee; and
(C)(iii) Requires all funds, income, and revenue to revert
to the General Revenue Fund Account or other fund or account as provided by
the General Assembly.
(B) The legislation prepared by the Joint Performance
Review Committee under subdivision (d)(3)(A) of this section shall be
submitted to the Governor on or before November 1 of each even-numbered year.
(4) This section does not prohibit the General Assembly from:
(A) Abolishing a state board or commission, other than a
constitutional board or commission, that has submitted a report; or
(B) Considering any other legislation relative to a state
agency subject to this chapter.
(5) Except as otherwise provided, abolition of a state board or
commission does not affect rights and duties that mature, penalties that were
incurred, civil or criminal liabilities that arose, or proceedings that were
begun before the effective date of the abolition of the state board or
commission.
(e)(1) If a constitutional board or commission has not convened a
regularly scheduled meeting or has convened without a quorum for four (4)
consecutive, regularly scheduled meeting dates within the preceding two-year
03-05-2025 10:22:12 LGL037

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 HB1461
period, the Joint Performance Review Committee shall reevaluate the purpose,
need, and effectiveness of the constitutional board or commission.

(2) The Joint Performance Review Committee shall report its findings and any
recommendations concerning the constitutional board or commission to the
Legislative Council no later than December 1 of each even-numbered year and
may draft legislation to implement the recommendations.
(3) The Joint Performance Review Committee shall submit all
reports received by a state board or commission under subdivision (d)(1) of
this section to the Legislative Council on or before December 1 of each year.

/s/L. Johnson
























03-05-2025 10:22:12 LGL037